Virginia statutes. Title 2.2. Administration of Government.
Article 1.
General Provisions.

§ 2.2-403. Compilation of compacts and related records and reports.

The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall conserve a copy of each of the compacts to which the Commonwealth is now or has been a party, commencing with the compact entered into with the state of North Carolina that is referenced in chapter XXIX of the October Session of the 1778 Acts of the General Assembly. The record shall contain the dates on which the compacts were confirmed by the Commonwealth.

In accordance with §

30-154.1

, beginning July 1, 2001, the Virginia Code Commission shall annually forward to the Secretary of the Commonwealth any newly enacted, amended or repealed compact as it was adopted by the Commonwealth.

The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall also maintain all records relating to the appointment of persons in accordance with compacts confirmed by the Commonwealth.

The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall report to the Governor and the Virginia Commission on Interstate Cooperation within fifteen days after the convening of each legislative session, and at such other times as deemed appropriate, on appointments and vacancies to the interstate boards, commissions and committees established for the purposes of such compacts.

(1976, c. 198, § 2.1-68.1; 2001, cc. 100, 844.)

Editor's note.

- Acts 2001, c. 100 amended

§

2.1-68.1, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to

§

30-152, Acts 2001, c. 100 has been given effect in this section as set out above. The 2001 amendment by c. 100, in the first paragraph, substituted "conserve a copy of each" for "prepare and maintain a compilation of all" in the first sentence, and in the second sentence, substituted "record" for "compilation" and deleted "and the complete texts of the terms of such compacts" at the end; and added the present second paragraph.